Illinois, session 104th, SB1486.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Junk 5Fee Ban Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Ancillary good or service" means any additional 8merchandise offered to a consumer as part of the same 9transaction.10    "Advertisement" means a notice in any printed material, 11television, Internet, email, text message, mobile or computer 12application, or any other similar physical, electronic, or 13digital communication regarding the sale of a good or service.14    "Bar" or "tavern" means an establishment that is devoted 15to the serving of alcoholic beverages for consumption by 16guests on the premises and that derives no more than 50% of its 17gross revenue from the sale of food consumed on the premises, 18including, but not limited to, bars, taverns, nightclubs, 19cocktail lounges, adult entertainment facilities, and 20cabarets.21    "Consumer goods or services" means goods and services that 22are used or bought for use primarily for personal, family, or 23household purposes.  SB1486 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 11472 SPS 21561 b1    "Display price" means the displayed price of a good or 2service provided to the consumer within the retail mercantile 3establishment or food service establishment's physical 4location or by Internet, email, text message, mobile or 5computer application, or any other similar physical, 6electronic, or digital communication.7    "Food service establishment" means a bar, tavern, or 8restaurant. "Food service establishment" includes bar, tavern, 9restaurant, commercial kitchen, or banquet, event, catering, 10or room service, operated by a hotel, that stores, prepares, 11provides, or packages food or beverage for human consumption, 12regardless of whether the food or beverage is consumed on or 13off the premises.14    "Insurance company" has the meaning given to the term 15"company" in subsection (e) of Section 5 of the Illinois 16Insurance Code.17    "Mandatory fee or charge" means a fee or charge that: (i) 18must be paid in order to purchase the goods or services being 19advertised or offered; or (ii) is not reasonably avoidable by 20the consumer. "Mandatory fee or charge" does not include taxes 21or fees imposed by a governmental or quasi-governmental entity 22on the sale, use, purchase, receipt, or delivery of the goods 23or services.24    "Person" means an individual, natural person, public or 25private corporation, government, partnership, unincorporated 26association, or other entity. "Person" does not include a food   SB1486 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 11472 SPS 21561 b1service establishment or a retail mercantile establishment.2    "Place of short-term lodging" means a hotel, motel, inn, 3short-term rental, or other place of lodging that advertises 4at a price that is a nightly, hourly, or weekly rate.5    "Restaurant" means any business that is primarily engaged 6in the sale of ready-to-eat food for immediate consumption. 7For the purpose of this definition, "primarily engaged" means 8having sales of ready-to-eat food for immediate consumption 9comprising at least 51% of the total sales, excluding the sale 10of liquor. 11    "Retail mercantile establishment" means a business that 12provides consumer goods and services to consumers at retail 13and generates occupation or use tax revenue. "Retail 14mercantile establishment" does not include a food service 15establishment, third-party delivery platform or company, or a 16place of short-term lodging.17    "Shipping charges" means the fees or charges that 18reasonably reflect the amount to be incurred to send goods to a 19consumer through the mail, including private mail services.20    "Third-party delivery platform or company" means a 21corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship, or other entity 22that: (i) operates in this State; and (ii) uses a website, 23software application, or digital network to connect a consumer 24with a courier to facilitate the delivery of goods or 25services.26    "Total price" means the maximum total of all amounts,   SB1486 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 11472 SPS 21561 b1including fees or charges, that a consumer must pay for a good 2or service, including any mandatory ancillary good or service. 3"Total price" does not include shipping charges or taxes, 4gratuities, discounts regulated under the Sale Price Ad Act, 5or fees collected and passed on to a quasi-governmental 6entity, including any assessment fees associated with a 7government created special district. 8    Section 10. Disclosure of mandatory fees or charges 9required.10    (a) It is an unlawful practice for any person to 11advertise, display, or offer a price for a good or service that 12does not include all mandatory fees or charges other than:13        (1) taxes or fees imposed by a government entity on 14    the transaction;15        (2) shipping charges that will be reasonably and 16    actually incurred to ship the physical good or product to 17    the consumer; or18        (3) fees collected and passed on to a 19    quasi-governmental entity, including any assessment fees 20    associated with a government created special district.21    (b) A third-party delivery platform or company is 22compliant with this Section if the platform or company :23        (1) clearly and conspicuously discloses at the point 24    when a consumer views and selects either a vendor or goods 25    or services for purchase, that an additional flat fee,   SB1486 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 11472 SPS 21561 b1    variable fee, or percentage fee is charged and the amount 2    of fee or percentage charged or, in the case of a variable 3    fee that is dependent on consumer selections or distance 4    and time, clearly and conspicuously disclose the factors 5    determining the fee, any mandatory fees or charges 6    associated with the transaction, and that the total price 7    of the services may vary; and8        (2) after a consumer selects the goods or services for 9    purchase but prior to checkout or completion of the 10    transaction, displays a subtotal page that itemizes the 11    price of the goods or services for purchase and the 12    additional flat fee, variable fee, or percentage fee that 13    is included in the total price.14    (c) A person offering services for which the total price 15of the service cannot reasonably be known at the time of the 16offer due to factors that determine the total price that are 17beyond the control of the person offering the service, 18including factors that are determined by consumer selections 19or preferences or that relate to distance or time, is 20compliant with this Section if the person discloses in a clear 21and conspicuous manner:22        (1) the factors that determine the total price;23        (2) any mandatory fees or charges associated with the 24    transaction; and25        (3) that the total price of the services may vary.   SB1486 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 11472 SPS 21561 b1    Section 15. Entities and transactions regulated by federal 2and State laws.3    (a) A person or entity that is required to provide 4disclosures in compliance with any of the following federal or 5State laws, and any rules or regulations adopted under those 6laws, is exempt from the requirements of Section 10 for 7purposes of that transaction:8        (1) the federal Truth in Savings Act, as amended (12 9    U.S.C. Sec. 4301 et seq.);10        (2) the federal Electronic Fund Transfer Act, as 11    amended (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1693 et seq.);12        (3) Section 19 of the Federal Reserve Act, as amended 13    (12 U.S.C. Sec. 461 et seq.);14        (4) the federal Truth in Lending Act, as amended (15 15    U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq.);16        (5) the federal Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act, 17    as amended (12 U.S.C. Sec. 2601 et seq.);18        (6) the federal Home Ownership and Equity Protection 19    Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1639);20        (7) the Consumer Installment Loan Act;21        (8) the Consumer Legal Funding Act;22        (9) the Interest Act;23        (10) the Motor Vehicle Retail Installment Sales Act;24        (11) the Retail Installment Sales Act;25        (12) the Payday Loan Reform Act;26        (13) the High Risk Home Loan Act;  SB1486 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 11472 SPS 21561 b1        (14) the Pawnbroker Regulation Act of 2023;2        (15) the Residential Mortgage Licensing Act of 1987;3        (16) the Residential Real Property Disclosure Act; and4        (17) the Student Loan Servicing Rights Act.5    (b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), nothing in this Act 6shall apply to banks, savings banks, or credit unions 7organized or chartered under the laws of this State, another 8state, or the United States, or any affiliates or subsidiaries 9thereof. 10    Section 20. Retail mercantile establishments; disclosure 11of total price. A retail mercantile establishment is not 12required to provide the total price in the display price of a 13consumer good or service. A retail mercantile establishment 14shall provide notice of a consumer fee or charge established 15and levied by the retail mercantile establishment prior to the 16purchase of the good or service within any available 17commercial channels in this subsection. A retail mercantile 18establishment may use any reasonable method available to 19provide notice of the total price, including, but not limited 20to, the following commercial channels:21        (1) on a screen, monitor, or other display at the 22    point of sale;23        (2) a website, Internet, email, text message, mobile 24    or computer application, or any other electronic or 25    digital communication;  SB1486 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 11472 SPS 21561 b1        (3) in-store consumer promotions, advertisement, or 2    any other similar display;3        (4) a membership, loyalty, or reward program or any 4    other similar program; or5        (5) any other reasonable means available to the retail 6    mercantile establishment. 7    Section 25. Food service establishments; disclosure of 8total price. A food service establishment is not required to 9provide the total price within the display price of food or 10beverages. A food service establishment shall provide notice 11of a consumer fee or charge established and levied by the food 12service establishment prior to the purchase of the food or 13beverage within any available commercial channels referenced 14in this subsection. A food service establishment may use any 15reasonable method available to provide notice of the total 16price, including, but not limited to, the following commercial 17channels:18        (1) at the establishment's premises on a menu, on a 19    tabletop or countertop display, through posted signage, or 20    by a contract for banquet, event or catering services that 21    fully discloses the terms of service;22        (2) on the establishment's website where food and 23    beverage prices are advertised;24        (3) on a screen, monitor, or other interactive 25    display;  SB1486 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 11472 SPS 21561 b1        (4) email, text message, mobile or computer 2    application, or any other electronic or digital 3    communication;4        (5) in-store consumer promotions, advertisement, or 5    any other similar display;6        (6) membership, loyalty, or reward program or any 7    other similar program; or8        (7) any other reasonable means available to the food 9    service establishment. 10    Section 30. Limitations.11    (a) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to limit, 12regulate, or prohibit a person, retail mercantile 13establishment, or food service establishment's ability to set 14prices for goods or services.15    (b) It is not a violation of this Act for a person to 16advertise, display, or offer the current bid in an ongoing 17auction, provided that the bid discloses clearly and 18conspicuously all amounts that the buyer would be required to 19pay if the bid was accepted.20    (c) The requirements of this Act do not apply to:21        (1) a wholesale club that sells consumer goods or 22    services through a membership model;23        (2) a rental company that excludes from the 24    advertised, displayed, or offered price of a rental 25    vehicle charges that are disclosed to the consumer in   SB1486 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 11472 SPS 21561 b1    compliance with Section 6-305 of the Illinois Vehicle 2    Code;3        (3) an air carrier that provides air transportation, 4    as those terms are used in 49 U.S.C. 41713;5        (4) a provider of broadband Internet access service on 6    its own or as part of a bundle that complies with federal 7    broadband consumer requirements codified in 47 CFR 8.2(a) 8    and its affiliates and subsidiaries;9        (5) a person that complies with federal pricing 10    transparency requirements set forth in 47 CFR 8.2(a) and 11    47 CFR 76.310 and the person's affiliates and 12    subsidiaries;13        (6) a place of short-term lodging that complies with 14    federal pricing transparency requirements and provisions 15    set forth in 16 CFR 464a;16        (7) an insurance company that is subject to regulation 17    under the Illinois Insurance Code; and18        (8) a telecommunications carrier as defined in Section 19    13-202 of the Public Utilities Act, a provider of wireless 20    services as described in Section 13-804 of the Public 21    Utilities Act, or an interconnected VoIP provider as 22    defined in Section 13-235 of the Public Utilities Act.23    (d) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to alter, 24amend, or supersede the motor vehicle advertising rules 25established under 14 Ill. Adm. Code 475, as authorized by the 26Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act.  SB1486 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 11472 SPS 21561 b1    (e) Any person that disseminates an advertisement and is 2independent of the advertiser is not liable for a violation of 3this Act based on the content of the advertisement. 4    Section 35. Interaction with other laws.5    (a) Nothing in this Act alters any federal law or 6regulation.7    (b) Nothing in this Act shall infringe or impede on any 8right or remedy available under State law or rule.9    (c) This Act is enforceable unless preempted by federal 10law.11    (d) Nothing in this Act prohibits a person from offering 12goods or services at a discounted price from the advertised, 13displayed, or offered price. 14    Section 40. Enforcement under the Consumer Fraud and 15Deceptive Business Practices Act. The Attorney General may 16enforce violations of this Act as an unlawful practice under 17the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act. All 18remedies, penalties, and authority granted to the Attorney 19General by that Act shall be available to the Attorney General 20for the enforcement of this Act. 21    Section 45. Home rule. The disclosure of the total price 22of a good or service is an exclusive power and function of the 23State. A home rule unit may not regulate the disclosure of   SB1486 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 11472 SPS 21561 b1total prices by retail mercantile establishments or food 2service establishments. This Section is a denial and 3limitation of home rule powers and functions under subsection 4(h) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution. 5    Section 90. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 6Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2HHHH as follows: 7    (815 ILCS 505/2HHHH new)8    Sec. 2HHHH. Violations of the Junk Fee Ban Act. A person 9who violates the Junk Fee Ban Act commits an unlawful practice 10within the meaning of this Act. The provisions of Section 10a 11do not apply to a violation of this Section.